Utah statutes.
63M-1-1103.   Duties of the office.
The office shall:
(1)  facilitate recycling development zones through state support of county
incentives which encourage development of manufacturing enterprises that use
recycling materials currently collected;
(2)  evaluate an application from a county or municipality executive authority
to be designated as a recycling market development zone and determine if the
county or municipality qualifies for that designation;
(3)  provide technical assistance to municipalities and counties in developing
applications for designation as a recycling market development zone;
(4)  assist counties and municipalities designated as recycling market
development zones in obtaining assistance from the federal government and
agencies of the state;
(5)  assist a qualified business in obtaining the benefits of an incentive or
inducement program authorized by this part;
(6)  monitor the implementation and operation of this part and conduct a
continuing evaluation of the progress made in the recycling market development
zone; and
(7)  submit an annual written report evaluating the effectiveness of the
program and providing recommendations for legislation to the Workforce
Services and Community and Economic Development Interim Committee and Natural
Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee not later than
November 1 of each year.
